District of Columbia statutes.
38-651.12

Rules.

(a)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

(b)

The Mayor may establish, by regulation, additional types of medication that a student may self-administer and other illnesses for which a student may self-administer medication other than those provided in this subchapter.

(c)

All existing rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to subchapter III of this chapter [§ 38-631 et seq.] [repealed], shall remain in effect until rules promulgated pursuant to this subchapter become effective.

History

Feb. 2, 2008, D.C. Law 17-107, § 13, 54 DCR 12230

Temporary Addition of Section

Section 9 of Law 17-52 added a section to read as follows:
“Sec. 9. Rules.
“(a) The Mayor, pursuant to Title 1 of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this act.
“(b) The Mayor may establish, by regulation, additional types of medication a student may self-administer and potentially life-threatening illnesses for which a student may self-administer medication other than those provided in this act.”
Section 11(b) of D.C. Law 17-52 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 9 of Student Access to Treatment Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-82, July 26, 2007, 54 DCR 7999).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 9 of Student Access to Treatment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-140, October 17, 2007, 54 DCR 10736).

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of Authority to the Student Access to Treatment Act of 2007, see Mayor’s Order 2008-85, June 11, 2008 ( 55 DCR 9362).